src/scripts/Spanish/numbers.foma
# SPDX-License-Identifier: GPL-3.0-or-later

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

# Copyright (C) 2024-2025  Mateo Cedillo <angelitomateocedillo@gmail.com>

source romans.foma

define MapRomanNumeral 
ESRomanMapping -> || .#. _ .#. ; 

define SpanishRoman 
[{II}:segundo|{III}:tercero|{IV}:cuarto|{VI}:sexto|{VII}:séptimo|{VIII}:octavo|{IX}:noveno] @-> || .#. _ .#. ; 

define MaleOrdChar %º ; 
define FemaleOrdChar %ª ; 
define OrdChar MaleOrdChar | FemaleOrdChar ; 
#define Separator %/ ; 
define ProcNumChar [ %-:menos |
%+: más |
%$: dólares |
%.: punto |
%,: coma ] ;

define NZDigit 1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9 ; 
define Digit %0|NZDigit ; 

define UnformattedNumber [NZDigit Digit^<16] ; 
#define Year [Digit^<5] ; 
#define DayOrMonth [Digit^<3] ; 
#define FormatedDate [DayOrMonth Separator DayOrMonth Separator Year] ; 
#define Number FormatedDate | [UnformattedNumber (OrdChar)] | ESRomanNumeral ; 
define Number [UnformattedNumber (OrdChar)] | ESRomanNumeral ; 

#define date 
#{01}:enero | 
#{02}:febrero | 
#{03}:marzo | 
#{04}:abril | 
#{05}:mayo | 
#{06}:junio | 
#{07}:julio | 
#{08}:agosto | 
#{09}:septiembre | 
#{10}:octubre | 
#{11}:noviembre | 
#{12}:diciembre ; 

#define months {01}|{02}|{03}|{04}|{05}|{06}|{07}|{08}|{09}|{10}|{11}|{12} ; 
# Up to 31 days:
#define days months|{13}|{14}|{15}|{16}|{17}|{18}|{19}|{20}|{21}|{22}|{23}|{24}|{25}|{26}|{27}|{28}|{29}|{30}|{31} ; 

define Unit 
1:uno | 
2:dós | 
3:tres | 
4:cuatro | 
5:cinco | 
6:seis | 
7:siete | 
8:ocho | 
9:nueve ; 

define MaleOrdUnit 
1:primero | 
2:segundo | 
3:tercero | 
4:cuarto | 
5:quinto | 
6:sexto | 
7:séptimo | 
8:octavo | 
9:noveno ; 

define FemaleOrdUnit 
1:primera | 
2:segunda | 
3:tercera | 
4:cuarta | 
5:quinta | 
6:sexta | 
7:séptima | 
8:octava | 
9:novena ; 

define Teen 
1:once | 
2:doce | 
3:trece | 
4:catorce | 
5:quince | 
6:dieciséis | 
7:diecisiete | 
8:dieciocho | 
9:diecinueve ; 

define Ten 
1:diez | 
2:veinte | 
3:treinta | 
4:cuarenta | 
5:cincuenta | 
6:sesenta | 
7:setenta | 
8:ochenta | 
9:noventa ; 

define MaleOrdTen 
1:décimo | 
2:vigésimo | 
3:trigésimo | 
4:cuadragésimo | 
5:quincuagésimo | 
6:sexagésimo | 
7:septagésimo | 
8:octogésimo | 
9:nonagésimo ; 

define FemaleOrdTen 
1:décima | 
2:vigésima | 
3:trigésima | 
4:cuadragésima | 
5:quincuagésima | 
6:sexagésima | 
7:septagésima | 
8:octogésima | 
9:nonagésima ; 

define Hundred 
1:ciento | 
2:doscientos | 
3:trescientos | 
4:cuatrocientos | 
5:quinientos | 
6:seiscientos | 
7:setecientos | 
8:ochocientos | 
9:novecientos ; 

define MaleOrdHundred 
1:centésimo | 
2:docentésimo | 
3:trecentésimo | 
4:cuatringentésimo | 
5:quingentésimo | 
6:sessentésimo | 
7:setingentésimo | 
8:octocentésimo | 
9:noningentésimo ; 

define FemaleOrdHundred 
1:centésima | 
2:docentésima | 
3:trecentésima | 
4:quatringentésima | 
5:quingentésima | 
6:sessentésima | 
7:setingentésima | 
8:octocentésima | 
9:noningentésima ; 

define PowerOfThousandSymbol ths|mlns|blns|tlns|mln|bln|tln ; 
define TenOrHundredSymbol ten|hnd0|hnd ; 
define PowerOfTenSymbol TenOrHundredSymbol|PowerOfThousandSymbol ; 

define OrdPowerOfThousandSymbol thth|mlnth|blnth|tlnth ; 
define OrdTenOrHundredSymbol tenth|hndth ; 
define OrdPowerOfTenSymbol OrdTenOrHundredSymbol|OrdPowerOfThousandSymbol ; 

define SeparatePowerOfThousand(s) [..] -> s || Digit _ Digit^3 [.#.|\Digit] ; 

define RemoveSilentGroups 
%0^3 (PowerOfThousandSymbol) @-> 0 ; 

define SeparateHundreds 
[..] -> hnd || Digit _ Digit^2 ; 

define Mark100s 
hnd -> hnd0 || 1 _ {00} ; 

define SeparateTens 
[..] -> ten || Digit _ Digit ; 

define MarkTenth 
ten -> tenth || Digit _ Digit OrdChar ; 

define MarkHundredth 
[hnd|hnd0] -> hndth || Digit _ Digit tenth ; 

define MarkThousandth 
ths -> thth || Digit _ [Digit hndth] | OrdChar ; 

define MarkOrdPowerOfThousand 
mlns:mlnth | blns:blnth | tlns:tlnth -> || _ OrdChar ; 

define RemoveZeros 
%0 ([TenOrHundredSymbol | OrdTenOrHundredSymbol]) @-> 0 ; 

define MarkTeens 
[[1 ten]:0] NZDigit [0:teen] -> ; 

define InsertAnds 
[..] -> and || 
NZDigit ten _ NZDigit ; 
#NZDigit hnd _ (%0 ten) NZDigit , 
#PowerOfThousandSymbol _ [[NZDigit [hnd|hnd0] %0 ten %0] | [%0 hnd (%0 ten) NZDigit]] .#. ; 

define RemoveOnes 
1 -> 0 || .#. _ ths | OrdPowerOfThousandSymbol ; 

define PowerOfThousandSymbolsToSingular 
[mlns:mln|blns:bln|tlns:tln] -> || [[PowerOfThousandSymbol (and)]|.#.] 1 _ ; 

define Translate 
OrdChar -> 0 ,, 
Unit -> || _ .#. | PowerOfThousandSymbol | OrdPowerOfThousandSymbol ,, 
MaleOrdUnit -> || _ MaleOrdChar .#. ,, 
FemaleOrdUnit -> || _ FemaleOrdChar .#. ,, 
Teen [teen:0] -> || _ ,, 
Ten [ten:0] -> || _ ,, 
MaleOrdTen [tenth:0] -> || _ ?* MaleOrdChar .#. ,, 
FemaleOrdTen [tenth:0] -> || _ ?* FemaleOrdChar .#. ,, 
Hundred [hnd:0] -> || _ ,, 
1 hnd0 -> cien || _ ,, 
MaleOrdHundred [hndth:0] -> || _ ?* MaleOrdChar .#. ,, 
FemaleOrdHundred [hndth:0] -> || _ ?* FemaleOrdChar .#. ,, 
ths -> mil || _ ,, 
and -> y || _ ,, 
[mln:millón | bln:billón | tln:trillón] -> || _ ,, 
[mlns:millones | blns:billones | tlns:trillones] -> || _ ,, 
[thth:milésimo | mlnth:millonésimo | blnth:billonésimo | tlnth:trillonésimo] -> || _ ?* MaleOrdChar .#. ,, 
[thth:milésima | mlnth:millonésima | blnth:billonésima | tlnth:trillonésima] -> || _ ?* FemaleOrdChar .#. ; 

define RemoveThousandsSeparators 
%. -> 0 ; 

define fixes 
[veinte y uno]:[veintiuno] -> || _ ,, 
[veinte y dós]:[veintidós] -> || _ ,, 
[veinte y tres]:[veintitrés] -> || _ ,, 
[veinte y cuatro]:[veinticuatro] -> || _ ,, 
[veinte y cinco]:[veinticinco] -> || _ ,, 
[veinte y seis]:[veintiséis] -> || _ ,, 
[veinte y siete]:[veintisiete] -> || _ ,, 
[veinte y ocho]:[veintiocho] -> || _ ,, 
[veinte y nueve]:[veintinueve] -> || _ ; 
# This is to consider when date is re-introduced in a future.
#[veinte y [uno|1]]:[veintiuno] -> || _ ,, 
#[veinte y [dós|2]]:[veintidós] -> || _ ,, 
#[veinte y [tres|3]]:[veintitrés] -> || _ ,, 
#[veinte y [cuatro|4]]:[veinticuatro] -> || _ ,, 
#[veinte y [cinco|5]]:[veinticinco] -> || _ ,, 
#[veinte y [seis|6]]:[veintiséis] -> || _ ,, 
#[veinte y [siete|7]]:[veintisiete] -> || _ ,, 
#[veinte y [ocho|8]]:[veintiocho] -> || _ ,, 
#[veinte y [nueve|9]]:[veintinueve] -> || _ ,, 
#[treinta y 1]:[treinta y uno] -> || _ ; 

define fixes2 
uno -> un || _ [mil|millón|billón|trillón] ; 
#Unit -> || .#. _ de [enero|febrero|marzo|abril|mayo|junio|julio|agosto|septiembre|octubre|noviembre|diciembre] ; 

#define fixes3 un -> 0 || del _ mil ; 

#define DateRule 
# Convert months to words.
#date -> || .#. days Separator _ Separator Year .#. ,, 
# In Spanish, convert the last slash (Separator) to del. Del 2024.
#Separator -> del || .#. days Separator months _ Year .#. ,, 
# And convert the first Separator to de. 2 de febrero.
#Separator -> de || .#. days _ months Separator Year .#. ,, 
# And when a day starts with 01, convert it to primero.
#{01} -> primero || .#. _ Separator months Separator Year ; 

define NumberRules 
Number .o. 
#DateRule .o. 
SpanishRoman .o. 
MapRomanNumeral .o. 
RemoveThousandsSeparators .o. 
SeparatePowerOfThousand(ths) .o. 
SeparatePowerOfThousand(mlns) .o. 
SeparatePowerOfThousand(blns) .o. 
SeparatePowerOfThousand(tlns) .o. 
RemoveSilentGroups .o. 
SeparateHundreds .o. 
Mark100s .o. 
SeparateTens .o. 
MarkTenth .o. 
MarkHundredth .o. 
MarkThousandth .o. 
MarkOrdPowerOfThousand .o. 
MarkTeens .o. 
InsertAnds .o. 
RemoveZeros .o. 
PowerOfThousandSymbolsToSingular .o. 
RemoveOnes .o. 
Translate .o. 
fixes .o. 
fixes2 ; 
#fixes3 ; 

define ZeroRule 
%0 : cero | 
[%0 MaleOrdChar] : cerésimo | 
[%0 FemaleOrdChar] : cerésima ; 

regex 
ProcNumChar | ZeroRule | NumberRules ; 
